Washington statutes.
RCW 35.31.070

Surplus to current expense fund.

If there is no judgment outstanding against the city or town for personal injuries the money remaining in the accident fund after the payment of the warrants drawn on that fund and interest in full shall be transferred to the current expense fund.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.31.070. Prior: 1909 c 128 s 4; RRS s 9485.]